Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 1 General Provisions

53-6-1.
Eligibility.

Any individual who is sui juris, regardless of citizenship or residency, is eligible to serve as a personal representative or temporary administrator of a decedent who dies domiciled in this state, subject to the requirements for qualification set forth in this chapter. Any other person is eligible to serve as a personal representative or temporary administrator of a decedent who dies domiciled in this state, subject to the requirements set forth in this chapter, provided the person is otherwise qualified to act as a fiduciary in this state.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 19.

53-6-2.
Executor de son tort.

Any person who, without authority of law, wrongfully intermeddles with or converts the personalty of a decedent whose estate is unrepresented shall be deemed an executor de son tort and as such shall be liable to the creditors and heirs or beneficiaries of the estate for double the value of the property so possessed and converted. Such executor shall not be allowed to set off any debt due the executor by the decedent or voluntarily paid by the executor out of the assets. If the executor dies, the executor’s personal representative shall be liable in the same manner and to the same extent as would the executor were the executor still living.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-6-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.